Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds and declares the following:
(a) The revitalization area shall include the voluntary participation of the
Kentucky counties, and the cities incorporated therein, that are defined as
rural based upon the Rural-Urban Continuum Codes 4 to 9 in alignment
with the United States Department of Agriculture Economic Research
Service’s metro and nonmetro designations;
(b) The revitalization area possesses a rich and proud history of social, cultural,
and economic contributions to the Commonwealth from its very beginning;
(c) Even though the revitalization area saw a significant decline in population
during the period 2011 through 2019, its population continues to be the
home to one million eight hundred fifty thousand (1,850,000) citizens who
live and work in the Commonwealth and desire to build a better future for
themselves, their families, and the generations that follow;
(d) The gross domestic product growth from 2001 to 2023 of eighteen percent
(18%) within the revitalization area was slower than the growth of forty-
nine percent (49%) in the thirty-five (35) urban areas;
(e) The citizens within the revitalization area currently, on average, earn
twenty-six percent (26%) less per capita than citizens within urban counties,
and citizens with a bachelor’s degree earn forty percent (40%) less;
(f) The revitalization area has a higher rate of home ownership than urban
areas, although the area also has triple the vacancy rate of urban areas;
(g) Agriculture and coal mining, both major contributors to the economy of the
revitalization area, have been declining for several years without
Page 1 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
comparable economic opportunities to mitigate the loss of earnings and tax
revenue;
(h) In the revitalization area, twenty-two percent (22%) of the population and
twenty-nine percent (29%) of all children live below the federal poverty level
compared to fourteen percent (14%) and twenty-one percent (21%),
respectively, in the urban areas;
(i) The revitalization area has a larger elderly population than urban areas,
resulting in part from the out migration of its young adults seeking
educational and economic opportunities;
(j) The revitalization area experiences worsening health care outcomes
resulting in shorter life expectancies and higher chronic illness rates than
urban areas due to higher risk factors, lack of health insurance coverage,
and lack of access to health care services; and
(k) In addition to many nonprofit and social organizations working in the
revitalization area to improve residential quality of life, elected leaders,
community leaders, and local philanthropists are united to envision a
public-private partnership to make investments which will promote
economic growth and the long-term well-being of the community.
(2) The purpose of Sections 1 to 7 and 8 of this Act is to:
(a) Support the restoration of and investment in the revitalization area; and
(b) Provide resources for additional opportunities for residents and businesses
of the revitalization area to work together to improve income, education
attainment, health outcomes, unemployment and job insecurity, working life
conditions, food insecurity, housing, basic amenities and the environment,
early childhood development, and the overall quality of life, thus
positioning the revitalization area to provide safe, prosperous, and enjoyable
communities needed, deserved, and expected by the residents, and for the
Page 2 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
area to become an equal partner with its urban counterparts in the future
for all of the Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 7 of this Act:
(1) "Affiliated" means each of the following:
(a) Members of a family, including brothers and sisters of the whole or half-
blood, spouse, parents, grandparents, ancestors, children, spouses of
children, grandchildren, spouses of grandchildren, and other lineal
descendants of an individual;
(b) An individual and a corporation, if more than ten percent (10%) in value of
the outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for that
individual;
(c) An individual and a limited liability company or partnership, if more than
ten percent (10%) of the capital interest or profits are owned or controlled,
directly or indirectly, by or for that individual; and
(d) An individual and a trust, if the individual is a grantor, fiduciary, or
beneficiary of the trust;
(2) "Board" means the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership;
(3) "CPI" means the nonseasonally adjusted average Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, between the two (2)
most recent calendar years available, as published by the United States Bureau of
Labor Statistics;
(4) "Governing body" means the legislative body of a city or county;
(5) "Incremental revenues" means the amount of revenues received by:
(a) A city or county, determined by subtracting old revenues from new revenues
in a calendar year with respect to the project development area; and
Page 3 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(b) The Commonwealth, determined by subtracting old revenues from new
revenues in a calendar year with respect to the project development area;
(6) "Local tax revenues":
(a) Means revenues derived by a city or county from one (1) or more of the
following sources:
1. Real property ad valorem taxes, excluding any taxes not assessed
while a property is participating in an assessment or reassessment
moratorium program under KRS 99.600; and
2. Occupational license taxes; and
(b) Does not mean revenues that have been pledged to support a tax increment
financing project established under KRS 65.490 to 65.499, 65.500 to 65.506,
65.680 to 65.699, or 65.7041 to 65.7083 or an economic development project
within the project development area;
(7) "New revenues" means the amount of:
(a) Local tax revenues received by a city or county with respect to the project
development area in any calendar year beginning with the calendar year
described under subsection (1) of Section 5 of this Act; and
(b) State tax revenues received by the Commonwealth with respect to the project
development area in any calendar year beginning with the calendar year
described under subsection (1) of Section 5 of this Act;
(8) "Old revenues":
(a) Means the amount of:
1 Local tax revenues received by a city and county with respect to the
project development area in any calendar year beginning with the
calendar year immediately preceding the calendar years described
under subsection (1) of Section 5 of this Act; and
2 State tax revenues received by the Commonwealth with respect to the
Page 4 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
project development area in any calendar year beginning with the
calendar year immediately preceding the calendar years described
under subsection (1) of Section 5 of this Act; and
(b) Shall be adjusted annually to incorporate the percentage change in the CPI.
In the first calendar year of the calendar years described under subsection
(1) of Section 5 of this Act, the calculated amount for the state tax revenues
and the local tax revenues shall be adjusted by multiplying each amount by
the percentage change in the CPI. For every calendar year thereafter until
the expiration of the calendar years described under subsection (1) of
Section 5 of this Act, the calculated amount for the state tax revenues and
the local tax revenues shall be the previous year's calculated amount
multiplied by the percentage change in the CPI;
(9) "Percentage change in the CPI" means the percentage of change in CPI from
one (1) year to the next based on averaging the twelve (12) consecutive months of
CPI data for each of the two (2) immediately preceding calendar years and then
using those two (2) averages to calculate a year-over-year percentage change;
(10) "Project" means a development approved by the board that provides
opportunities for improving income, education, health, employment, working
conditions, food insecurity, housing needs, childcare, child development,
environmental conditions, access to basic needs, and quality of life;
(11) "Project development area" means a geographic area defined within a
revitalization area by the board for the purpose of a project;
(12) "Revitalization area" means a region as identified by the Kentucky counties that
is defined as rural based upon the Rural-Urban Continuum Codes 4 to 9 in
alignment with the United States Department of Agriculture Economic Research
Service’s metro and nonmetro designations; and
(13) "State tax revenues":
Page 5 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(a) Means revenues received by the Commonwealth from one (1) or more of the
following sources:
1. State real property ad valorem taxes, excluding any taxes not assessed
while a property is participating in an assessment or reassessment
moratorium program under KRS 99.600;
2. Individual income taxes required to be withheld by an employer under
KRS 141.310; and
3. Sales taxes imposed under KRS 139.200, excluding sales taxes already
pledged for:
a. Approved tourism attraction projects, as defined in KRS 148.851,
within the revitalization area; and
b. Projects which are approved for sales tax refunds under
Subchapter 20 of KRS Chapter 154 within the revitalization
area; and
(b) Does not mean revenues that have been pledged to support a tax increment
financing project established under KRS 65.490 to 65.499, 65.500 to 65.506,
65.680 to 65.699, or 65.7041 to 65.7083 or an economic development project
within the project development area.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership is hereby created and
shall be a public body corporate and politic, with the powers and duties in its
corporate name to:
(a) Have a corporate seal;
(b) Determine membership of the revitalization area based upon:
1. Voluntary participation of city and county governments within the
revitalization area evidenced by a resolution passed by the respective
Page 6 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
governing bodies authorizing participation in and contribution to the
revitalization area; and
2. Voluntary participants agreeing to the terms and conditions of
membership participation;
(c) Determine renewal of voluntary memberships based upon:
1. Participation in the activities of the revitalization area;
2. The payment of any dues or fees, if any, approved by the board;
3. Development and submission of a biennial strategic plan by each
voluntary participant that identifies the perceived strengths,
weaknesses, opportunities, and threats within their specific city or
county and a plan with measurable goals to address opportunities for
improvement which are related to:
a. Improving incomes;
b. Improving education attainment;
c. Improving health outcomes;
d. Reducing unemployment;
e. Increasing job insecurity;
f. Improving working life conditions;
g. Reducing food insecurity;
h. Addressing housing need;
i. Improving access to childcare and improving early childhood
development;
j. Protecting the environment; and
k. Addressing access to basic amenities and improving the overall
quality of life; and
4. Development and submission of an annual strategic plan progress
report;
Page 7 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(d) Sue and be sued;
(e) Make or execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to
the exercise of its powers;
(f) Make, and from time to time amend and repeal, bylaws and procedures,
including a policy and procedure for replacing any institution that has a
permanent seat on the board, should an institution cease to exist or change
corporate form, to effect the purposes of Sections 1 to 7 and 8 of this Act;
(g) Hire and maintain personnel;
(h) Borrow from and accept loans and grants from the federal, state, local
jurisdictions, or any agency thereof, or from any sources, public or private,
and to pledge security as may be required;
(i) Invest any funds held in reserves or any funds not required for immediate
disbursements, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally
invest funds subject to their control;
(j) Purchase bonds at a price not more than the principal amount thereof and
accrued interest, and cancel all bonds so purchased;
(k) Plan initiatives within the revitalization area;
(l) Establish project development areas within the revitalization area;
(m) Ensure that the defined borders for a project development area do not cross
over the defined borders of another project development area;
(n) Invest in projects and neighborhood-based or neighborhood-directed
initiatives led by other organizations seeking to invest within the
revitalization area;
(o) Make loans to businesses, individuals, or other organizations seeking to
invest within the revitalization area;
(p) Receive proceeds from loans and grants;
(q) Purchase, acquire, own, hold, and dispose of all real and personal property
Page 8 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
necessary for carrying out its corporate purposes;
(r) Invest in projects that create affordable housing within the revitalization
area;
(s) Communicate with the advisory council established in Section 7 of this Act
to seek specific knowledge about the community;
(t) Adopt and comply with KRS Chapter 45A or develop a procurement code
designed to provide for the purchase of supplies, equipment, services, and
construction items that provide the greatest long-term benefit to the
revitalization area, the greatest integrity for the Rural Kentucky
Revitalization Opportunity Partnership, and the best service and products
for the public;
(u) Develop a program that will:
1. Raise awareness of the income tax credit created in Section 8 of this
Act;
2. Enable individuals in the revitalization area to timely pay property
taxes by lending funds on a short-term basis until the income tax
credit is paid to the individual; and
3. Assist individuals residing in the revitalization area and qualifying for
the income tax credit by filling out returns or other paperwork
required to claim the tax credit;
(v) Create an account for the incremental tax increases collected from property
owners of residential property located within the revitalization area;
(w) Create an account to make home improvements for existing property
owners of residential property located within the revitalization area; and
(x) Exercise any power, duties, and requirements for carrying out its corporate
purposes under Sections 1 to 7 and 8 of this Act.
(2) The purpose of the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership shall
Page 9 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
be to:
(a) Manage and support the restoration of and investment in the revitalization
area, with a focus on projects supported by residents and businesses within
the revitalization area;
(b) Encourage private investment in businesses and residential projects that
will have a significant impact within the revitalization area;
(c) Ensure that all projects include the employment of area residents, both in
short-term construction jobs and long-term employment in businesses
locating within the revitalization area; and
(d) Ensure that all housing projects include the creation of housing that is
deemed affordable in accordance with federal guidelines for low-income
families.
(3) The Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership shall comply with
KRS 61.800 to 61.850 and 61.870 to 61.884.
(4) The board shall comply with KRS Chapter 65A and the Rural Kentucky
Revitalization Opportunity Partnership shall be subject to audit under KRS
43.070.
(5) (a) The Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership is solely
responsible for its operations. A debt of the Rural Kentucky Revitalization
Opportunity Partnership is not a debt of the Commonwealth or any city or
county. An action of the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity
Partnership is not an action of the Commonwealth or any city or county and
shall not obligate the Commonwealth or any city or county in any manner.
(b) Bonds issued by the board under this section do not constitute a debt of the
Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof, or a pledge of the
faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision
thereof, and such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds and security
Page 10 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
provided therefor under Sections 1 to 7 of this Act, and all such bonds shall
contain on the face thereof a statement to that effect.
(6) Operating expenditures, including but not limited to management fees,
investment fees, legal fees, and administrative fees shall not exceed five percent
(5%) of gross contributions received by the Rural Kentucky Revitalization
Opportunity Partnership.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership shall be governed by
a board. The board shall initially consist of the following members:
(a) Two (2) members, for a term of three (3) years, appointed by the executive
board of directors of the Kentucky League of Cities from the pool of mayors
who are members of that organization and presently serve within the
revitalization area;
(b) Three (3) members, for a term of three (3) years, appointed by the executive
board of directors of the Kentucky County Judge/Executive Association
from the pool of county judges executive who are members of that
organization and presently serve within the revitalization area;
(c) A representative of the University of Kentucky, appointed by its board of
trustees for a term of three (3) years;
(d) A representative of one (1) of the regional public universities located east of
Interstate 65 appointed by the Council on Postsecondary Education, for a
term of three (3) years;
(e) A representative of one (1) of the regional public universities located west of
Interstate 65 appointed by the Council on Postsecondary Education, for a
term of three (3) years;
(f) A representative of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System
Page 11 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
appointed by its board of trustees, for a term of three (3) years;
(g) A representative of Shaping Our Appalachian Region appointed by its
board of trustees, for a term of three (3) years; and
(h) 1. The following members who shall be appointed by the Governor:
a. One (1) member from among the executive directors of area
chambers of commerce within the revitalization area ;
b. One (1) member from the Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis,
Louisville Branch;
c. One (1) member from a Kentucky-based foundation with assets
over one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000); and
d. One (1) member from a Kentucky bank with local assets greater
than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000).
2. The initial appointments of the members described in subparagraph 1.
of this paragraph shall be for terms as follows:
a. One (1) member for a term of one (1) year;
b. One (1) member for a term of two (2) years;
c. One (1) member for a term of three (3) years; and
d. One (1) member for a term of four (4) years.
(2) The board shall include in its bylaws a process for appointing one (1) member
from each of the six (6) geographic regions within the revitalization area as
additional members. The process shall:
(a) Ensure the six (6) members are each from a different geographic region
within the state which are identified as the Eastern Kentucky Coal Field, the
Knobs, the Bluegrass, the Pennyroyal, the Western Kentucky Coal Field,
and the Jackson Purchase;
(b) Require that, at all times, at least one (1) of the six (6) members
representing the different geographic regions within the state shall be
Page 12 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
between the ages of eighteen (18) and thirty (30) at the time of appointment
or reappointment; and
(c) Provide that the initial appointment of the members be for terms as follows:
1. Four (4) members for a term of two (2) years; and
2. Two (2) members for a term of three (3) years.
(3) After expiration of the terms provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
the board shall self-perpetuate. The overall makeup of the board shall remain the
same unless an institution ceases to exist or changes corporate form. All
successors of the representatives described in subsection (1) of this section shall
serve four (4) year terms and all successors of the representatives described in
subsection (2) of this section shall serve three (3) year terms. No individual shall
serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(4) Additional members of the board to serve as nonvoting, ex officio members shall
be:
(a) The executive directors of each of the area development districts within the
revitalization area, or their designees;
(b) The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or his or her
designee;
(c) The Commissioner of Agriculture or his or her designee; and
(d) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or her
designee.
(5) The membership of the board shall not exceed twenty-one (21) voting members.
(6) A chair of the board shall be selected annually from its members and shall have
responsibility for board meeting agendas and presiding at board meetings.
(7) Members of the board shall be entitled only to reimbursement from the Rural
Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership for actual expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties as board members.
Page 13 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(8) A majority of the entire voting membership of the board shall constitute a
quorum, and all actions of the board shall be by vote of a majority of its entire
voting membership.
(9) A member of the board shall abstain from action on an official decision in which
he or she has or may have a personal or private interest, or if the member is
affiliated with any party conducting business with the Rural Kentucky
Revitalization Opportunity Partnership, shall disclose the existence of that
personal or private interest or affiliation in writing to the other members of the
board on the same day on which the member becomes aware that the interest or
affiliation exists or that an official decision may be under consideration by the
board. The member which has or may have a personal or private interest or
affiliation shall be absent from all meetings and votes in relation to the matter.
(10) As a prerequisite to service, each appointee to the board and each member of the
Rural Kentucky Revitalization Advisory Council established in Section 7 of this
Act shall participate in a board-sanctioned training program on the topics of
community and economic development, finance, equity and community
engagement, gentrification, and the implications of these concepts.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding KRS 6.945, beginning in the calendar year following the full
receipt of the initial funds statutorily required to be invested by private sector
investors, a city or county, and the Commonwealth to the Rural Kentucky
Revitalization Opportunity Partnership and continuing for twenty (20) years,
eighty-five (85%) percent of the incremental revenues shall be pledged to the
Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership by a city or county and
the Commonwealth.
(2) A local participation agreement shall be executed between the Rural Kentucky
Page 14 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
Revitalization Opportunity Partnership and the governing bodies involved in
providing financing or pledging incremental revenues to support the
implementation of a development plan in a project development area.
(3) The local participation agreement shall be adopted by a governing body by
ordinance and shall include but not be limited to the following provisions:
(a) Identification of the parties to the local participation agreement and the
duties and responsibilities of each entity under the agreement;
(b) Specific identification of the incremental revenues released or pledged by
type of tax by each taxing district;
(c) The anticipated benefit to be received by each taxing district for the release
or pledge, including a detailed summary of old revenues collected;
(d) A requirement that pledged incremental revenues shall be accounted for
within a separate account under Section 6 of this Act;
(e) Terms of default and remedies, provided that no remedy shall permit the
withholding by any party to the local participation agreement of any
incremental revenues pledged to the special fund if increment bonds are
outstanding that are secured by a pledge of those incremental revenues;
(f) The commencement date, activation date, and termination date; and
(g) Any other provisions not inconsistent with Sections 1 to 7 and 8 of this Act.
(4) Any pledge of incremental revenues in a local participation agreement shall be
superior to any other pledge of revenues for any other purpose and shall, from
the activation date to the termination date set forth in the local participation
agreement, supersede any statute, ordinance, or resolution regarding the
application or use of incremental revenues. An ordinance in conflict with a local
participation agreement shall not be adopted while any increment bonds secured
by that pledge remain outstanding. Ordinances or resolutions pledging
incremental revenues on a subordinate basis to any existing pledges may be
Page 15 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
adopted.
(5) The local participation agreement executed under this section and a project
development area shall not be included in the percentage calculation established
by KRS 65.7049(2).
(6) Notwithstanding KRS 65.7049(2), the local participation agreement shall permit
residential property located within the project development area to be eligible for
participation in a program granting property assessment or reassessment
moratoriums pursuant to KRS 99.600 when the incremental revenues related to
that residential property have not been pledged to support a tax increment
financing project established under KRS 65.490 to 65.499, 65.500 to 65.506,
65.680 to 65.699, or 65.7041 to 65.7083 or an economic development project
within the project development area.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, " department" means the Department of Revenue.
(2) All documentation, records, and release of incremental revenues relating to local
tax revenues shall be maintained and determined by the governing body.
(3) All documentation, records, and release of incremental revenues relating to state
tax revenues shall be maintained and determined by the department.
(4) Upon notice from the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership, a
governing body obligated under a local participation agreement and the
department shall release to the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity
Partnership the incremental revenues due.
(5) (a) The governing body and the department shall have no obligation to refund
or otherwise return any of the incremental revenues to the taxpayer from
whom the incremental revenues arose or are attributable.
(b) No additional incremental revenues resulting from audit, amended returns,
Page 16 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
or other activity for any period shall be transferred after the initial release
to the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership for that
period.
(6) If the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership issues bonds for
project developments within the revitalization area and incremental revenues
have been pledged for the developments, the Rural Kentucky Revitalization
Opportunity Partnership shall maintain a separate account to account for the:
(a) Bond proceeds received;
(b) Incremental revenues received; and
(c) Payment of debt charges of the bond.
(7) The Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership shall provide a
biennial report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on or before August 1, 2027,
and on or before August 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter. The report
shall contain the following information:
(a) The amounts of money received by private sector investors, a city or county
and the Commonwealth, including the party that made the payment;
(b) The annual financial statements of the Rural Kentucky Revitalization
Opportunity Partnership, including the current balances of all funds and
accounts of the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership;
(c) The total amount of state tax revenues and local tax revenues received by a
project development area within the revitalization area for the preceding
biennial period categorized by each type of tax;
(d) The operating expenditures incurred by the Rural Kentucky Revitalization
Opportunity Partnership, including management fees, investment fees, legal
fees, or administrative fees incurred;
(e) A list of the projects supported by investments from the Rural Kentucky
Page 17 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
Revitalization Opportunity Partnership in the preceding year and a
description of the investment amount contributed by the Rural Kentucky
Revitalization Opportunity Partnership for each project;
(f) The amount of bonds issued or other borrowed moneys received by the
Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership;
(g) Any personal or private interests or affiliated board members as described
in subsection (9) of Section 4 of this Act; and
(h) Upon request from the General Assembly, copies of the Rural Kentucky
Revitalization Opportunity Partnership's bylaws and any contracts or
agreements in which the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity
Partnership is a party.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Rural Kentucky Revitalization Advisory Council is hereby established as a
subcommittee of the Rural Kentucky Revitalization Opportunity Partnership. The
council shall consist of:
(a) One (1) resident from each of the fifteen (15) area development districts
located within the revitalization area;
(b) One (1) member from the Volunteers of America Mid States;
(c) One (1) member from the Foundation for a Healthy Kentucky; and
(d) One (1) member from the Central Kentucky Community Action Council.
(2) The members of the council shall serve four (4) year terms, except initial
appointments shall be for terms as follows:
(a) Four (4) members for a term of one (1) year;
(b) Six (6) members for a term of two (2) years;
(c) Six (6) members for a term of three (3) years; and
(d) Two (2) members for a term of four (4) years.
Page 18 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(3) The Governor shall appoint the initial members of the council, and after
expiration of the terms provided in subsection (2) of this section the council shall
self-perpetuate.
(4) The council shall:
(a) Elect its own chairperson and establish other officers as needed to execute
the duties of the council;
(b) Adopt bylaws and operate under its bylaws;
(c) Establish and evaluate goals and outcomes for economic development and
housing issues in the revitalization area; and
(d) Assist the board with information about the revitalization area community
and its economic development and housing project needs.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 141 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Owner" means:
1. The individual who owned a residential property on January 1, 2026;
or
2. Upon the death of the individual specified in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, a beneficiary who:
a. Is a lineal descendant of the individual, but also including a
spouse, child, legally adopted child, grandchild, brother, sister,
parent, or grandparent; and
b. Inherits the residential property of the individual;
(b) "Project development area" has the same meaning as in Section 2 of this
Act;
(c) "Property tax" means the total ad valorem tax paid to the Commonwealth, a
local city or county, and all taxing districts on the residential property; and
Page 19 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(d) "Residential property" means: the principal residence of the owner that is
located in a project development area and is owned as of January 1, 2026.
(2) There is hereby created the rural Kentucky revitalization credit allowable against
the tax imposed under KRS 141.020, with the ordering of credits under Section 9
of this Act.
(3) (a) The credit permitted by subsection (2) of this section shall be a refundable,
nontransferable tax credit to the owner of residential property in the project
development area.
(b) The credit shall be equal to the amount in which the property tax timely
paid on the residential property in a taxable year exceeds the amount of
property tax assessed on that residential property on January 1, 2026.
(4) The credit shall end the earlier of the taxable year in which:
(a) The residential property is sold by the owner; or
(b) The period allowed for incremental revenues under Section 5 of this Act
ends.
(5) (a) In order for the General Assembly to evaluate the rural Kentucky
revitalization area credit, the department shall provide the following
information on a cumulative basis for each taxable year to provide a
historical impact of the credit to the Commonwealth:
1. The total amount of tax credit claimed for each taxable year by all
owners;
2. The total amount of tax credit for each taxable year which is used to
offset tax liability of owners and the total amount that is refunded to
owners;
3. The physical address of the residential property which created the tax
credit;
4. The amount of the tax credit claimed for the taxable year for each
Page 20 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
physical address;
5. The amount of the tax credit used to offset tax liability and the amount
refunded to the owner at that physical address; and
6. Based on ranges of net income no larger than five thousand dollars
($5,000), the total amount of tax credit claimed and the number of
returns claiming a tax credit for each adjusted gross income range.
(b) The report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be submitted
to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue beginning no later than
November 1, 2028, and each November 1 thereafter, as long as the credit is
claimed on any return processed by the department.
Section 9. KRS 141.0205 is amended to read as follows:
If a taxpayer is entitled to more than one (1) of the tax credits allowed against the tax
imposed by KRS 141.020, 141.040, and 141.0401, the priority of application and use of
the credits shall be determined as follows:
(1) The nonrefundable business incentive credits against the tax imposed by KRS
141.020 shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The limited liability entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.0401;
(b) The economic development credits computed under KRS 141.347, 141.381,
141.384, 141.3841, 141.400, 141.403, 141.407, 141.415, 154.12-207, and
154.12-2088;
(c) The qualified farming operation credit permitted by KRS 141.412;
(d) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.397(1)(a);
(e) The health insurance credit permitted by KRS 141.062;
(f) The tax paid to other states credit permitted by KRS 141.070;
(g) The credit for hiring the unemployed permitted by KRS 141.065;
(h) The recycling or composting equipment credit permitted by KRS 141.390;
Page 21 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(i) The [tax ]credit for cash contributions in investment funds permitted by KRS
154.20-263 in effect prior to July 15, 2002, and the credit permitted by KRS
154.20-258;
(j) The research facilities credit permitted by KRS 141.395;
(k) The employer High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit
permitted under KRS 151B.402;
(l) The voluntary environmental remediation credit permitted by KRS 141.418;
(m) The biodiesel and renewable diesel credit permitted by KRS 141.423;
(n) The clean coal incentive credit permitted by KRS 141.428;
(o) The ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4242;
(p) The cellulosic ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4244;
(q) The energy efficiency credits permitted by KRS 141.436;
(r) The railroad maintenance and improvement credit permitted by KRS 141.385;
(s) The Endow Kentucky credit permitted by KRS 141.438;
(t) The New Markets Development Program credit permitted by KRS 141.434;
(u) The distilled spirits credit permitted by KRS 141.389;
(v) The angel investor credit permitted by KRS 141.396;
(w) The film industry credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved
on or after April 27, 2018, but before January 1, 2022;
(x) The inventory credit permitted by KRS 141.408;
(y) The renewable chemical production credit permitted by KRS 141.4231; and
(z) The qualified broadband investment [tax] credit permitted by KRS 141.391;
(2) After the application of the nonrefundable credits in subsection (1) of this section,
the nonrefundable personal tax credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020
shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The individual credits permitted by KRS 141.020(3);
(b) The credit permitted by KRS 141.066;
Page 22 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(c) The tuition credit permitted by KRS 141.069;
(d) The household and dependent care credit permitted by KRS 141.067;
(e) The income gap credit permitted by KRS 141.066; and
(f) The Education Opportunity Account Program [tax ]credit permitted by KRS
141.522;
(3) After the application of the nonrefundable credits provided for in subsection (2) of
this section, the refundable credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 shall be
taken in the following order:
(a) The individual withholding tax credit permitted by KRS 141.350;
(b) The individual estimated tax payment credit permitted by KRS 141.305;
(c) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.3961, 171.3963, and
171.397(1)(b);
(d) The film industry [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications
approved prior to April 27, 2018, or on or after January 1, 2022;
(e) The development area [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.398;
(f) The decontamination [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.419;[ and]
(g) The pass-through entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.209; and
(h) The rural Kentucky revitalization credit permitted by Section 8 of this act.
(4) The nonrefundable credit permitted by KRS 141.0401 shall be applied against the
tax imposed by KRS 141.040;
(5) The following nonrefundable credits shall be applied against the sum of the tax
imposed by KRS 141.040 after subtracting the credit provided for in subsection (4)
of this section, and the tax imposed by KRS 141.0401 in the following order:
(a) The economic development credits computed under KRS 141.347, 141.381,
141.384, 141.3841, 141.400, 141.403, 141.407, 141.415, 154.12-207, and
154.12-2088;
(b) The qualified farming operation credit permitted by KRS 141.412;
Page 23 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(c) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.397(1)(a);
(d) The health insurance credit permitted by KRS 141.062;
(e) The unemployment credit permitted by KRS 141.065;
(f) The recycling or composting equipment credit permitted by KRS 141.390;
(g) The coal conversion credit permitted by KRS 141.041;
(h) The enterprise zone credit permitted by KRS 154.45-090, for taxable periods
ending prior to January 1, 2008;
(i) The [tax] credit for cash contributions to investment funds permitted by KRS
154.20-263 in effect prior to July 15, 2002, and the credit permitted by KRS
154.20-258;
(j) The research facilities credit permitted by KRS 141.395;
(k) The employer High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit
permitted by KRS 151B.402;
(l) The voluntary environmental remediation credit permitted by KRS 141.418;
(m) The biodiesel and renewable diesel credit permitted by KRS 141.423;
(n) The clean coal incentive credit permitted by KRS 141.428;
(o) The ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4242;
(p) The cellulosic ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4244;
(q) The energy efficiency credits permitted by KRS 141.436;
(r) The ENERGY STAR home or ENERGY STAR manufactured home credit
permitted by KRS 141.437;
(s) The railroad maintenance and improvement credit permitted by KRS 141.385;
(t) The railroad expansion credit permitted by KRS 141.386;
(u) The Endow Kentucky credit permitted by KRS 141.438;
(v) The New Markets Development Program credit permitted by KRS 141.434;
(w) The distilled spirits credit permitted by KRS 141.389;
(x) The film industry credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved
Page 24 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
on or after April 27, 2018, but before January 1, 2022;
(y) The inventory credit permitted by KRS 141.408;
(z) The renewable chemical production [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.4231;
(aa) The Education Opportunity Account Program [tax ]credit permitted by KRS
141.522; and
(ab) The qualified broadband investment [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.391;
and
(6) After the application of the nonrefundable credits in subsection (5) of this section,
the refundable credits shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The corporation estimated tax payment credit permitted by KRS 141.044;
(b) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.3961, 171.3963, and
171.397(1)(b);
(c) The film industry [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications
approved prior to April 27, 2018, or on or after January 1, 2022;
(d) The decontamination [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.419; and
(e) The pass-through entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.209.
Section 10. KRS 131.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No present or former commissioner or employee of the department, present or
former member of a county board of assessment appeals, present or former property
valuation administrator or employee, present or former secretary or employee of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, former secretary or employee of the Revenue
Cabinet, or any other person, shall intentionally and without authorization inspect
or divulge any information acquired by him or her of the affairs of any person, or
information regarding the tax schedules, returns, or reports required to be filed with
the department or other proper officer, or any information produced by a hearing or
investigation, insofar as the information may have to do with the affairs of the
person's business.
Page 25 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(2) The prohibition established by subsection (1) of this section shall not extend to:
(a) Information required in prosecutions for making false reports or returns of
property for taxation, or any other infraction of the tax laws;
(b) Any matter properly entered upon any assessment record, or in any way made
a matter of public record;
(c) Furnishing any taxpayer or his or her properly authorized agent with
information respecting his or her own return;
(d) Testimony provided by the commissioner or any employee of the department
in any court, or the introduction as evidence of returns or reports filed with the
department, in an action for violation of state or federal tax laws or in any
action challenging state or federal tax laws;
(e) Providing an owner of unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, and other mineral or
energy resources assessed under KRS 132.820, or owners of surface land
under which the unmined minerals lie, factual information about the owner's
property derived from third-party returns filed for that owner's property, under
the provisions of KRS 132.820, that is used to determine the owner's
assessment. This information shall be provided to the owner on a confidential
basis, and the owner shall be subject to the penalties provided in KRS
131.990(2). The third-party filer shall be given prior notice of any disclosure
of information to the owner that was provided by the third-party filer;
(f) Providing to a third-party purchaser pursuant to an order entered in a
foreclosure action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, factual
information related to the owner or lessee of coal, oil, gas reserves, or any
other mineral resources assessed under KRS 132.820. The department may
promulgate an administrative regulation establishing a fee schedule for the
provision of the information described in this paragraph. Any fee imposed
shall not exceed the greater of the actual cost of providing the information or
Page 26 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
ten dollars ($10);
(g) Providing information to a licensing agency, the Transportation Cabinet, or
the Kentucky Supreme Court under KRS 131.1817;
(h) Statistics of gasoline and special fuels gallonage reported to the department
under KRS 138.210 to 138.448;
(i) Providing any utility gross receipts license tax return information that is
necessary to administer the provisions of KRS 160.613 to 160.617 to
applicable school districts on a confidential basis;
(j) Providing documents, data, or other information to a third party pursuant to an
order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(k) Publishing administrative writings on its official website in accordance with
KRS 131.020(1)(b); or
(l) Providing information to the Legislative Research Commission under:
1. KRS 139.519 for purposes of the sales and use tax refund on building
materials used for disaster recovery;
2. KRS 141.436 for purposes of the energy efficiency products credits;
3. KRS 141.437 for purposes of the ENERGY STAR home and the
ENERGY STAR manufactured home credits;
4. KRS 141.383 for purposes of the film industry incentives;
5. KRS 154.26-095 for purposes of the Kentucky industrial revitalization
credit and the job assessment fees;
6. KRS 141.068 for purposes of the Kentucky investment fund;
7. KRS 141.396 for purposes of the angel investor credit;
8. KRS 141.389 for purposes of the distilled spirits credit;
9. KRS 141.408 for purposes of the inventory credit;
10. KRS 141.390 for purposes of the recycling and composting credits;
11. KRS 141.3841 for purposes of the selling farmer credit;
Page 27 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
12. KRS 141.4231 for purposes of the renewable chemical production
credit;
13. KRS 141.524 for purposes of the Education Opportunity Account
Program credit;
14. KRS 141.398 for purposes of the development area credit;
15. KRS 139.516 for purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions for the
commercial mining of cryptocurrency;
16. KRS 141.419 for purposes of the decontamination credit;
17. KRS 141.391 for purposes of the qualified broadband investment credit;
18. KRS 139.499 for purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions for a
qualified data center project;[ and]
19. KRS 139.5325 for purposes of the sales and use tax incentive for a
qualifying attraction; and
20. Section 8 of this Act for purposes of the rural Kentucky revitalization
credit.
(3) The commissioner shall make available any information for official use only and on
a confidential basis to the proper officer, agency, board or commission of this state,
any Kentucky county, any Kentucky city, any other state, or the federal
government, under reciprocal agreements whereby the department shall receive
similar or useful information in return.
(4) Access to and inspection of information received from the Internal Revenue Service
is for department use only, and is restricted to tax administration purposes.
Information received from the Internal Revenue Service shall not be made available
to any other agency of state government, or any county, city, or other state, and
shall not be inspected intentionally and without authorization by any present
secretary or employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, commissioner or
employee of the department, or any other person.
Page 28 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2031
(5) Statistics of crude oil as reported to the department under the crude oil excise tax
requirements of KRS Chapter 137 and statistics of natural gas production as
reported to the department under the natural resources severance tax requirements
of KRS Chapter 143A may be made public by the department by release to the
Energy and Environment Cabinet, Department for Natural Resources.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with mine-map
submissions for the 1989 tax year, the department may make public or divulge only
those portions of mine maps submitted by taxpayers to the department pursuant to
KRS Chapter 132 for ad valorem tax purposes that depict the boundaries of mined-
out parcel areas. These electronic maps shall not be relied upon to determine actual
boundaries of mined-out parcel areas. Property boundaries contained in mine maps
required under KRS Chapters 350 and 352 shall not be construed to constitute land
surveying or boundary surveys as defined by KRS 322.010 and any administrative
regulations promulgated thereto.
Section 11. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or 6
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Page 29 of 29
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:09 AM Jacketed